test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-odd_gt-norm.yaml
  Adj - goavššas: # EATTAS
    goavššas+A+Attr: goavššasis
    goavššas+A+Sg+Nom: goavššas
    goavššas+A+Sg+Gen: goakšasa
    goavššas+A+Sg+Acc: goakšasa
    goavššas+A+Sg+Ill: goakšasii
    goavššas+A+Sg+Loc: goakšasis
    goavššas+A+Pl+Acc: goakšasiid
    goavššas+A+Pl+Com: goakšasiiguin
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [goakšaseabbo, goakšasabbo, goakšasut, goakšasit, goakšaset, goakšasat]
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasabbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [goakšaseamos, goakšasamos]
    goavššas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [goakšasepmosiin, goakšasamosiin]
    goavššas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goakšasit

  Adj - boahkis: # BOAKKAS
    boahkis+A+Sg+Nom: boahkis
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen: boahkkása
    boahkis+A+Sg+Acc: boahkkása
    boahkis+A+Sg+Ill: boahkkásii
    boahkis+A+Sg+Loc: boahkkásis
    boahkis+A+Pl+Acc: boahkkásiid
    boahkis+A+Pl+Com: boahkkásiiguin
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseabbo, boahkkásabbo, boahkkásut, boahkkásit, boahkkáset, boahkkásat]
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseamos, boahkkásamos]
    boahkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [boahkkásepmosiin, boahkkásamosiin]
    boahkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: boahkkásit

  Adj - gearpmus: # GAPPUS
    gearpmus+A+Attr: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Nom: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen: gerbmosa
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Acc: gerbmosa
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Ill: gerbmosii
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Loc: gerbmosis
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Acc: gerbmosiid
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Com: gerbmosiiguin
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseabbo, gerbmosabbo, gerbmosut, gerbmosit, gerbmoset, gerbmosat]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseamos, gerbmosamos]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [gerbmosepmosiin, gerbmosamosiin]
    gearpmus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gerbmosit

  Adj - lámis: # VATTIS
    lámis+A+Attr: [lámes, lámisis, lámis]
    lámis+A+Sg+Nom: lámis
    lámis+A+Sg+Gen: lápmása
    lámis+A+Sg+Acc: lápmása
    lámis+A+Sg+Ill: lápmásii
    lámis+A+Sg+Loc: lápmásis
    lámis+A+Pl+Acc: lápmásiid
    lámis+A+Pl+Com: lápmásiiguin
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [lápmáseabbo, lápmásabbo, lápmásut, lápmásit, lápmáset, lápmásat]
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásabbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [lápmáseamos, lápmásamos]
    lámis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [lápmásepmosiin, lápmásamosiin]
    lámis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lápmásit

  Adj - biekkus: # BIEKKUS
    biekkus+A+Attr: biekkusis
    biekkus+A+Sg+Nom: biekkus
    biekkus+A+Sg+Gen: biggosa
    biekkus+A+Sg+Acc: biggosa
    biekkus+A+Sg+Ill: biggosii
    biekkus+A+Sg+Loc: biggosis
    biekkus+A+Pl+Acc: biggosiid
    biekkus+A+Pl+Com: biggosiiguin
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [biggoseabbo, biggosabbo, biggosut, biggosit, biggoset, biggosat]
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [biggoseappuid, biggosabbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [biggoseamos, biggosamos]
    biekkus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [biggosepmosiin, biggosamosiin]
    biekkus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: biggosit

  Adj - roattus: # LIEKKUS
    roattus+A+Attr: [roattusis, roattus]
    roattus+A+Sg+Nom: roattus
    roattus+A+Sg+Gen: roddosa
    roattus+A+Sg+Acc: roddosa
    roattus+A+Sg+Ill: roddosii
    roattus+A+Sg+Loc: roddosis
    roattus+A+Pl+Acc: roddosiid
    roattus+A+Pl+Com: roddosiiguin
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [roddoseabbo, roddosabbo, roddosut, roddosit, roddoset, roddosat]
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [roddoseappuid, roddosabbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [roddoseamos, roddosamos]
    roattus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [roddosepmosiin, roddosamosiin]
    roattus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roddosit

  Adj - guoros: # GUOROS
    guoros+A+Attr: guoros
    guoros+A+Sg+Nom: guoros
    guoros+A+Sg+Gen: gurrosa
    guoros+A+Sg+Acc: gurrosa
    guoros+A+Sg+Ill: gurrosii
    guoros+A+Sg+Loc: gurrosis
    guoros+A+Pl+Acc: gurrosiid
    guoros+A+Pl+Com: gurrosiiguin
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gurroseabbo, gurrosabbo, gurrosut, gurrosit, gurroset, gurrosat]
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gurroseappuid, gurrosabbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gurroseamos, gurrosamos]
    guoros+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [gurrosepmosiin, gurrosamosiin]
    guoros+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gurrosit

  Adj - ruojus: # NUOLUS
    ruojus+A+Attr: ruojos
    ruojus+A+Sg+Nom: ruojus
    ruojus+A+Sg+Gen: rudjosa
    ruojus+A+Sg+Acc: rudjosa
    ruojus+A+Sg+Ill: rudjosii
    ruojus+A+Sg+Loc: rudjosis
    ruojus+A+Pl+Acc: rudjosiid
    ruojus+A+Pl+Com: rudjosiiguin
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [rudjoseabbo, rudjosabbo, rudjosut, rudjosit, rudjoset, rudjosat]
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosabbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [rudjoseamos, rudjosamos]
    ruojus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [rudjosepmosiin, rudjosamosiin]
    ruojus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rudjosit

  Adj - gearggus: # GEARGGUS
    gearggus+A+Attr: gearggos
    gearggus+A+Sg+Nom: gearggus
    gearggus+A+Sg+Gen: gergosa
    gearggus+A+Sg+Acc: gergosa
    gearggus+A+Sg+Ill: gergosii
    gearggus+A+Sg+Loc: gergosis
    gearggus+A+Pl+Acc: gergosiid
    gearggus+A+Pl+Com: gergosiiguin
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gergoseabbo, gergosabbo, gergosut, gergosit, gergoset, gergosat]
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gergoseappuid, gergosabbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gergoseamos, gergosamos]
    gearggus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [gergosepmosiin, gergosamosiin]
    gearggus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gergosit

  Adj - šihttui: # JIEDNAI
    šihttui+A+Attr: šihttos
    šihttui+A+Sg+Nom: šihttui
    šihttui+A+Sg+Gen: šihtto
    šihttui+A+Sg+Acc: šihtto
    šihttui+A+Sg+Ill: šihttui
    šihttui+A+Sg+Loc: šihttos
    šihttui+A+Sg+Com: šihttuin
    šihttui+A+Pl+Com: šihttuiguin
    šihttui+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: šihttot
    šihttui+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: šihttobuid
    šihttui+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: šihttomus
    šihttui+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: šihttomusain
    šihttui+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: šihttojit

  Adj - coagis: # BOARIS
    coagis+A+Attr: coages
    coagis+A+Sg+Nom: coagis
    coagis+A+Sg+Gen: coahkása
    coagis+A+Sg+Acc: coahkása
    coagis+A+Sg+Ill: coahkásii
    coagis+A+Sg+Loc: coahkásis
    coagis+A+Pl+Acc: coahkásiid
    coagis+A+Pl+Com: coahkásiiguin
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [coahkáseabbo, coahkásabbo, coahkásut, coahkásit, coahkáset, coahkásat]
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásabbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [coahkáseamos, coahkásamos]
    coagis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [coahkásepmosiin, coahkásamosiin]
    coagis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: coahkásit

  Adj - govdat: # ALLAT
    govdat+A+Attr: [govda, govdes]
    govdat+A+Sg+Nom: govdat
    govdat+A+Sg+Gen: [govdaga, govdada]
    govdat+A+Sg+Acc: [govdaga, govdada]
    govdat+A+Sg+Ill: [govdagii, govdadii]
    govdat+A+Sg+Loc: [govdagis, govdadis]
    govdat+A+Pl+Acc: [govdagiid, govdadiid]
    govdat+A+Pl+Com: [govdagiiguin, govdadiiguin]
    govdat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [govddit]
    govdat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [govddibuid]
    govdat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [govddimus]
    govdat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [govddimusain]
    govdat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [govdagit, govdadit]

  Adj - guvrelágan: # LAGAN
    guvrelágan+A+Attr:   [guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Nom: [guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Gen: [guvrelágana, guvrelágána]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Acc: [guvrelágana, guvrelágána]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Ill: [guvreláganii, guvrelágánii]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Loc: [guvreláganis, guvrelágánis]
    guvrelágan+A+Pl+Acc: [guvreláganiid, guvrelágániid]
    guvrelágan+A+Pl+Com: [guvreláganiiguin, guvrelágániiguin]

  Adj - goahccelágaš: # LAGAS
    goahccelágaš+A+Attr:   [goahccelágaš, goahccelágáš]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Nom: [goahccelágaš, goahccelágáš]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Gen: [goahccelágaža, goahccelágáža]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Acc: [goahccelágaža, goahccelágáža]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Ill: [goahccelágažii, goahccelágážii]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Loc: [goahccelágažis, goahccelágážis]
    goahccelágaš+A+Pl+Acc: [goahccelágažiid, goahccelágážiid]
    goahccelágaš+A+Pl+Com: [goahccelágažiiguin, goahccelágážiiguin]

  Adj - gohpevuđot: # AGAdj
    gohpevuđot+A+Attr:   gohpevuđot
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Nom: gohpevuđot
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Gen: gohpevuđoga
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Acc: gohpevuđoga
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Ill: gohpevuđogii
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Loc: gohpevuđogis
    gohpevuđot+A+Pl+Acc: gohpevuđogiid
    gohpevuđot+A+Pl+Com: gohpevuđogiiguin
